Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ROCHESTER AREA FOUNDATION PAMOJA WOMEN PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to the Rochester Area Foundation for the Pamoja Women program to provide women's health education and to provide parent education programming. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end